Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Part C. Registration and Modification of Child Support Order of Another State

407.5609.
Procedure to register child support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in this state in the same manner provided in KRS

407.5601

,

407.5602

,

407.5603

,

407.5604

,

407.5605

,

407.5606

,

407.5607

, and

407.5608

if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later. The pleading shall specify the grounds for modification.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 54; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 48, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5610.
Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of this state may enforce a child support order of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered support order may be modified only if the requirements of KRS

407.5611

or

407.5613

have been met.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 55; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 49, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 14, effective July 15, 2016.

407.5611.
Modification of child support order of another state.

If KRS

407.5613

does not apply, upon petition a tribunal of this state may modify a child support order issued in another state which is registered in this state if, after notice and hearing, the tribunal finds that:

The following requirements are met:

Neither the child, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the obligor resides in the issuing state;

A petitioner who is a nonresident of this state seeks modification; and

The respondent is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state; or

This state is the residence of the child, or a party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state, and all of the parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing tribunal for a tribunal of this state to modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Modification of a registered child support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures, and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of this state and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

A tribunal of this state may not modify any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation of support. If two (2) or more tribunals have issued child support orders for the same obligor and same child, the order that controls and shall be so recognized under KRS

407.5207

establishes the aspects of the support order which are nonmodifiable.

In a proceeding to modify a child support order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The obligor’s fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of this state.

On the issuance of an order by a tribunal of this state modifying a child support order issued in another state, the tribunal of this state becomes the tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (5) of this section and KRS 407.5201(2), a tribunal of this state retains jurisdiction to modify an order issued by a tribunal of this state if:

One (1) party resides in another state; and

The other party resides outside the United States.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 56; 1998, ch. 101, § 17, 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 50, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5612.
Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child support order issued by a tribunal of this state is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act as provided in KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

, a tribunal of this state:

May enforce its order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the modification;

May provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

Shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 57; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 51, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 15, effective July 15, 2016.

407.5613.
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of another state when individual parties reside in this state.

If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter, this Article, and the procedural and substantive law of the state to the proceeding for enforcement or modification. Articles 3, 4, 5, 7, and 8 do not apply.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 18, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 52, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5614.
Notice of modification to issuing tribunal.

Within thirty (30) days after issuance of a modified child support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order, and in each tribunal in which the party knows that the earlier order has been registered. A party who obtains the order and fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 101, § 19, effective March 23, 1998.

407.5615.
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of foreign country.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

407.5711

, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether the consent to modification of a child support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to KRS

407.5611

has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 18, § 53, effective June 24, 2015.